Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of the
Attorney General from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars
($200,00.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to facilitate
the operation of the National Child Identification Program through
the Human Trafficking Response Unit for the kindergarten class of
the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 10911 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10911 CMA 01/02/25




















Req. No. 10911 Page 2